Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.540.100

Validation of proceedings under 1955 act, when.

All proceedings had and taken under chapter 344, Laws of 1955, shall be valid and binding although not in compliance with that act if said proceedings comply with the requirements of this chapter.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.170. Prior: 1959 c 262 s 11. Formerly RCW 28A.56.170, 28.56.170.]